Maine, session 132, LD1535.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4173, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Permit required. A permit is required for the installation or upgrade of electrical
service to a total of 300 amperes or more in a residential building. The ampere ratings of
all electrical panels must be added together to determine whether the 300-ampere threshold
in this subsection is met. If the residential building is in a municipality that has provided
for electrical inspections, the person performing the work must apply to the municipal
electrical inspector in writing for a permit. If the residential building is not in a municipality
that has provided for electrical inspections, the person performing the work must apply to
a state electrical inspector in writing for a permit. A municipal electrical inspector or state
electrical inspector shall notify the transmission and distribution utility that serves the
residential building of an application made under this subsection.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3217, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Suspicious power use reports. The following provisions govern the reporting of
suspicious power use. A consumer-owned transmission and distribution utility and an
investor-owned transmission and distribution utility shall report to the code enforcement
or inspection authority of a municipality whenever the transmission and distribution utility
becomes aware that one of the following events has occurred within that municipality:
A. A 300-ampere or more total service is installed or an existing service is upgraded to
a 300-ampere or more total service at a residential property, regardless of whether that
installation or upgrade is a single 300-ampere or more panel or multiple smaller panels
the sum of which is 300 amperes or more;
B. A transformer malfunctions;
C. A transformer larger than 25 kilovolt-amperes is installed or a transformer is
upgraded to a transformer larger than 25 kilovolt-amperes for a residential customer;
D. There is a month-to-month increase in power consumption greater than 500% for a
residential customer; or
E. Upon investigation, the transmission and distribution utility finds evidence that
power diversion or theft has occurred by circumventing a residential meter to obtain
access to service.
The report must include the square footage of the residential property and the reason for
the power increase, if known to the consumer-owned transmission and distribution utility
or the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility.